Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.130

Use of sales and use tax funds. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

Money collected from the taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475 may be used only for the purpose of paying debt service on bonds issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go basis as provided in RCW 39.102.195, or both.

[ 2007 c 229 s 11; 2006 c 181 s 402.]

NOTES:

Application—Severability—2007 c 229: See notes following RCW 39.102.020.